Utah statutes.
78B-6-1224.   Sales at public auction -- Notice.

All sales of real property made by referees under this part shall be made at public auction to the highest bidder, upon notice published in the manner required for the sale of real property on execution.  The notice shall state the terms of sale, and if the property or any part of it is to be sold subject to a prior estate, charge, or lien, that fact shall be stated also.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 3, 2008 General Session

